en: Pork chop suey
fr: Chop suey de porc, Chop suey au porc

en: Cooked unsalted couscous, Unsalted durum wheat semolina pre-cooked with steam
fr: Couscous non salé, Semoule de blé dur roulée précuite à la vapeur non salée

en: Prepared couscous
da: Tilberedt couscous
de: Zubereitetes Couscous
es: Cuscús preparado
fi: kypsennetty couscous
fr: Couscous préparés, couscous préparé
hr: Pripremljenog kus-kusa
it: Couscous pronto
lt: Pagamintas kuskusas
nl: Kant-en-klaar couscous

en: Couscous with vegetables
bg: Кускус със зеленчуци
da: Couscous med grøntsager
fr: Couscous de légumes, Couscous aux légumes
hr: Kus-kus s povrćem
lt: Kuskusas su daržovėmis

en: Couscous with fish
bg: Кускус с риба
fr: Couscous au poisson
hr: Kus-kus s ribom
lt: Kuskusas su žuvimi

en: Couscous with mutton
fr: Couscous au mouton
hr: Kus-kus s ovčetinom
lt: Kuskusas su aviena

en: Couscous with meat
bg: Кускус с месо
fr: Couscous à la viande
hr: Kus-kus s mesom
lt: Kuskusas su mėsa

en: Royal couscous, Royal couscous with different meats
fr: Couscous royal, Couscous avec plusieurs viandes, Couscous royal avec plusieurs viandes

en: Chicken couscous
fr: Couscous au poulet
hr: Pileći kuskus
lt: Kuskusas su vištiena

en: Light couscous with meat, Light couscous with chicken, Low fat couscous with meat, Low fat couscous with chicken
fr: Couscous à la viande allégé, Couscous au poulet allégé

en: Cooked mixed vegetables for couscous
fr: Légumes cuits pour couscous
hr: Kuhano miješano povrće za kus-kus
lt: Keptos daržovės skirtos kuskusui

en: Meals with shellfish
fr: Plats aux fruits de mer
hr: Jela sa školjkama
it: Piatti ai frutti di mare
lt: Patiekalai su vėžiagyviais

en: Dishes with scallops, prepared dishes with scallops
es: Platos preparados con vieiras
fi: kampasimpukkaruokalajit
fr: Plats aux noix de Saint-Jacques, plats préparés aux noix de Saint-Jacques
hr: Jela s jakobovim kapicama
nl: Bereide gerechten met scallops

en: Meals with shrimps
fr: Plats aux crevettes
hr: Jela sa škampima
lt: Patiekalai su krevetėmis
nl: Schaaldiermaaltijd, Schaaldiermaaltijden

en: Meals with fish, fish dishes
bg: Рибени ястия
ca: Aliments amb peix
de: Fischmahlzeiten
es: Comidas con pescado
fi: Kala-ateriat
fr: Plats préparés au poisson, plats à base de poisson, Plats préparés à base de poisson
hr: Jela s ribom
hu: Halételek
it: Pasti con pesce
ja: 魚料理
lt: Žuvies patiekalai, patiekalai su žuvimi
nl: Vismaaltijden
pl: Dania z rybami, Dania z rybą
pt: Refeições com peixe, pratos com peixe
ru: Блюда с рыбой

en: Frozen fish in sauce
fr: Poisson en sauce surgelé
hr: Smrznuta riba u umaku
lt: Šaldyta žuvis padaže

en: Meals with cooked white fish
fr: Plats préparés au poisson blanc cuit
hr: Jela s kuhanom bijelom ribom
lt: Patiekalai su kepta balta žuvimi

fr: Poisson blanc à la marinière, Poisson blanc à la sauce aux oignons et vin blanc et moules
en: Marinière-style white fishes, White fish with shallots and mussels and white wine sauce

en: Fish with bordelaise sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à la bordelaise, Poisson à la bordelaise

en: White fish with Parisian-style sauce, White fish with mushrooms sauce
fr: Poisson blanc à la parisienne, Poisson blanc à la sauce aux champignons